Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-4207
Stroke triage assessment tool; post on web site.

The department shall adopt and distribute a nationally recognized, standardized stroke triage assessment tool. The department shall post the stroke triage assessment tool on the department's web site and provide a copy of the assessment tool to each emergency medical service licensed pursuant to the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act.

Laws 2016, LB722, § 7.

Emergency Medical Services Practice Act, see section 38-1201.